Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4055.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 275. For tax years that begin on and after January 1, 2025, a taxpayer may credit against the tax imposed by this part an amount equal to 50% of the credit the taxpayer is allowed to claim as a credit under section 24 of the internal revenue code for a tax year on a return filed under this act for the same tax year. If the credit allowed by this section exceeds the tax liability of the taxpayer for the tax year, that portion of the credit that exceeds the tax liability must be refunded.